Hawaii, session 2026, HB2605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that participation in the arts supports health and well-being by improving emotional regulation, communication, confidence, and social connection.  The legislature further finds that specialized arts programs and therapeutic arts interventions can provide meaningful academic, social, and emotional benefits for individuals with autism, attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder, and other neurodivergent conditions, particularly in underserved communities where access to supportive services may be limited. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the state foundation on culture and the arts to: (1)  Continue and scale arts and health programming for underserved and neurodiverse populations; and (2)  Establish a position within the state foundation on culture and the arts to support the implementation, coordination, and sustainability of these programs statewide. SECTION 2.  The state foundation on culture and the arts shall establish one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position to support implementation and coordination of specialized arts programs and therapeutic arts interventions for underserved and neurodiverse populations. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $170,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as follows: (1)  $63,452 to continue and scale specialized arts programs and therapeutic arts interventions tailored to the needs of individuals with autism, attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder, and other neurodivergent conditions; and (2)  $106,548 to establish the position established in section 2 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________